Utah statutes.
34-45-104.   Protection from liability.

A person that owns or controls a parking area that is subject to this chapter and that complies with the requirements of Section 34-45-103 is not liable in any civil action for any occurrence resulting from, connected with, or incidental to the use of a firearm, by any person, unless the use of the firearm involves a criminal act by the person who owns or controls the parking area.

